North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4.1 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4.1-15 Northern Crops Institute

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 61, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

4.1-15-01.
Northern crops institute — Northern crops council — Powers and duties — Gifts and grants — Continuing appropriation.

The northern crops institute is administered by and in conjunction with North Dakota state university.

The northern crops council, in consultation with the president of North Dakota state university, shall appoint the director of the northern crops institute and may remove the director for cause. The director shall manage the institute, hire and compensate necessary personnel within the limits of legislative appropriations, prepare a biennial budget, and serve as executive secretary to the northern crops council. The council shall fix the salary of the director, within the limits of legislative appropriations, in consultation with the president of North Dakota state university.

The president of North Dakota state university may participate in the hiring of a director for the institute, including serving on search committees, advertising, and interviewing and negotiating with candidates.

Funds appropriated to the northern crops institute may not be commingled with funds appropriated to North Dakota state university. Appropriation requests of the northern crops institute must be separate from appropriation requests of North Dakota state university.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 61, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-15-02.
Northern crops council — Duties — Chairman — Meetings.

The northern crops council shall establish policies for the operation of the northern crops institute.

The council consists of:

The agriculture commissioner or the commissioner’s designee;

The president of North Dakota state university of agriculture and applied science or the president’s designee;

The president and general manager of the North Dakota mill and elevator association;

An individual selected by the North Dakota barley council;

An individual selected by the North Dakota oilseed council;

An individual selected by the North Dakota soybean council;

An individual selected by the North Dakota wheat commission;

No fewer than five nor more than seven individuals who produce northern crops, selected by the members referenced in subdivisions a through g; and

No more than four representatives of industries that process northern crops, selected by the members designated in subdivisions a through g.

The term of office for each member of the council referenced in subdivisions d through i of subsection 1 is three years, and those members are limited to two 3-year terms.

Each term of office begins with the first meeting after the member’s appointment.

Annually, the council members shall select one of the individuals referenced in subdivisions d through i of subsection 1 to serve as the chairman.

The council shall meet at least three times annually at the times and places as determined by the council and may meet in special meeting upon the call and notice as may be prescribed by rules adopted by the council.

If a member is unable to attend a meeting of the council, the member may be represented by an individual who has a written proxy from the member.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 61, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-15-03.
Purpose — Powers and duties.

The northern crops institute shall provide technical and marketing assistance through specialized training courses and technical services that facilitate domestic and market development and expanded sales of northern grown crops. The institute shall render services including:

In-plant consultations regarding crop quality problems, product manufacturing, and possible purchasing methods and standards.

Short courses in product milling and processing, plant management, county elevator management, grain grading, and marketing of crops.

Educational and career and technical education training programs in milling, processing, manufacturing, purchasing methods, marketing procedures, product sales techniques, and other related subjects to be conducted for users of northern crops.

Short-term investigations, consultation, evaluation, and research to solve technical problems involved in the maintenance of quality and utilization of northern crops.

Annual surveys and quality analyses of new northern crops and monitoring of the quality and condition of commodities in market channels.

Research on northern crop damage problems and solutions.

Identification of problem areas in marketing northern crops abroad.

Preparation of instructional, informational, and reference publications on the end use, technical aspects of marketing, and utilization of northern crops for distribution domestically and abroad.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 61, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-15-04.
Gifts and grants — Continuing appropriation.

The northern crops institute may contract for and accept private contributions and gifts and grants-in-aid from the federal government, private industry, and other sources. Those funds may be spent only for the purposes of this chapter and for any purposes designated in the gift, grant, or donation and those funds are appropriated on a continuing basis to the northern crops institute for those purposes.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 61, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.